Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4814
Applicability of act.

Except as otherwise provided in the Farm Mediation Act, nothing in the act shall be applicable to or shall affect any legal proceedings filed by any party in mediation.

Laws 1988, LB 664, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 200, § 8.